South Dakota, session 2026, SB219.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 50-2-1.1 be AMENDED:
50-2-1.1. The commission shall continue within the department, and all its
functions shall be performed by the department as provided by § 1-44-11.
The commission shall provide advice and expertise to a state agency regarding the
purchase, transfer and disposition of state owned and operated aircraft, including those
owned or operated by any state institution. A state agency shall consult the commission
prior to purchasing, transferring, or disposing of state owned and operated aircraft,
excluding any unmanned aircraft, small unmanned aircraft, and small unmanned aircraft
system as defined in § 50-1-1.
The commission shall provide advice and expertise in the form of a written report
to the Governor and the agency requesting the information.
The requirements of this section do not apply to the Board of Regents, or any
institutions of higher education under the control of the board, if the board determines
that the primary use of the aircraft is for educational purposes.
The requirements of this section do not apply to the South Dakota Board of
Technical Education, or any institutions of higher education under the control of the board,
if the board determines that the primary use of the aircraft is for educational purposes.

26.821.20 2 219
An Act to require that a state agency consult with the Aeronautics Commission prior to
purchasing, transferring, or disposing of a state owned and operated aircraft.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 219
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 219 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB219 ENROLLED